Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Chapter 2 Public Service Commission

Commission does not have power to cap price of telephone exchange.—

The statutory scheme that creates and empowers the Public Service Commission does not grant the Commission the power to cap the price of a telephone exchange at 1.7 times the net book value of the telephone exchange. Tri County Tel. Ass'n v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 910 P.2d 1359,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1996).

Commission may not attach conditions precedent. —

Subsection (c) of §

37-2-205

empowers the Commission to condition certificates that have already been issued, but does not empower the Commission to attach conditions precedent. Tri County Tel. Ass'n v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 910 P.2d 1359,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1996).

Commission may not meddle in private sector's affairs. —

The Public Service Commission may not meddle in the private sector's contractual affairs. The Commission does not have authority to order an exchange carrier to sell a particular exchange to an unsuccessful bidder. Therefore, the Commission's granting of a conditional certificate of public convenience and necessity was reversed as unlawful meddling. Union Tel. Co. v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 910 P.2d 1362,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Public service commission's implied authority to order refund of public utility revenues, 41 ALR5th 783.